Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 860 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section, “data center” means a


facility that is designed to have a load of one hundred (100)


megawatts or more and the primary purpose of which is the storage,


management, and processing of digital data via the interconnection


and operation of information technology and network


telecommunications equipment, including all related facilities and


infrastructure for backup electricity generation, power


distribution, environmental control, cooling, and security.



Req. No. 2621 Page 1


B. There is hereby established a moratorium on the building or


establishing of data centers in this state until November 1, 2029.


C. 1. Before November 1, 2029, the Corporation Commission


shall conduct a study on the potential impacts that data centers


might have on the following, including, but not limited to:


a. the water supply of this state, including, but not


limited to, aquifers, streams, lakes, and wastewater


treatment plants,


b. utility rates,


c. property values within a three-mile radius of a


proposed data center, and


d. other pertinent areas as determined by the Commission.


2. In addition to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, the Corporation Commission shall conduct a study, in the


interest of security reasons, of ideal locations for data centers in


this state.


D. The Corporation Commission shall electronically submit a


report of the study findings pursuant to subsection C of this


section to the Legislature and include recommendations for


regulating data centers to promote the health of the electric grid,


waters, and environment of this state, as well as recommendations


for the sourcing of data center components that limit threats to the


privacy and security of the citizens of this state.



Req. No. 2621 Page 2


E. The Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.




60-2-2621 CN 1/9/2026 9:33:48 AM









































Req. No. 2621 Page 3